Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1161.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2104 of Title 5 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2104. Physician or , PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR certified registered nurse practitioner to be in attendance.(A) EMPLOYMENT AND DUTIES.--Before any professional wrestling contest or exhibition shall take place, the promoter and the operator of the arena or facility shall employ a physician or , PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR certified registered nurse practitioner to be present at every wrestling contest or exhibition. The physician or , PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR certified registered nurse practitioner shall observe the physical condition of the participants throughout the contest or exhibition and shall be authorized to terminate the contest or <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 exhibition when, in his judgment, severe injury would result if the contest or exhibition were to continue. A certified registered nurse practitioner employed by the promoter shall practice in accordance with sections 8.2, 8.3 and 8.7 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law. The [physician's] fee for the physician or certified registered nurse practitioner shall be paid by the promoter. EXHIBITION WERE TO CONTINUE. [THE PHYSICIAN'S FEE](B) CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONERS.--A CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER EMPLOYED BY THE PROMOTER SHALL PRACTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS 8.2, 8.3 AND 8.7 OF THE ACT OF MAY 22, 1951 (P.L.317, NO.69), KNOWN AS THE PROFESSIONAL NURSING LAW.(C) PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS.--A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT EMPLOYED BY THE PROMOTER SHALL PRACTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 13 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 20, 1985 (P.L.457, NO.112), KNOWN AS THE MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF 1985, OR SECTION 10 OF THE ACT OF OCTOBER 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, NO.261), KNOWN AS THE OSTEOPATHIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT.(D) FEES.--THE FEE FOR THE PHYSICIAN, PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER SHALL BE PAID BY THE PROMOTER.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1161PN2423 - 2 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223